Utah statutes.
79-4-602.   Mountain Meadow Massacre site included within state park system.
(1) The Mountain Meadow Massacre site and monument is included within the
state park system.
(2)  The division may:
(a)  enter into an agreement with the United States Forest Service for the use
of land at the site as a state park; and
(b)  receive donations of land or facilities at the site for inclusion within
the state park.
